pt-PT: Características de portabilidade da roda giratória móvel: Desmonta-se para arrumação; Pega de transporte incorporada; Componentes dobráveis; Estrutura dobrável; Inclui saco de transporte; Inclui estojo de viagem rígido; Design leve; Posição dobrada bloqueável; Montagem/desmontagem rápida; Compatível com mala de rodinhas; Pontos de fixação para alça de ombro; Outro
el: Χαρακτηριστικά φορητότητας τροχού γνεσίματος ταξιδιού: Αποσυναρμολογείται για πακετάρισμα; Ενσωματωμένη λαβή μεταφοράς; Αναδιπλούμενα εξαρτήματα; Πτυσσόμενο πλαίσιο; Περιλαμβάνει τσάντα μεταφοράς; Περιλαμβάνει σκληρή θήκη ταξιδιού; Ελαφρύς σχεδιασμός; Ασφάλιση στη διπλωμένη θέση; Γρήγορη συναρμολόγηση/αποσυναρμολόγηση; Συμβατό με τροχήλατη θήκη; Σημεία πρόσδεσης ιμάντα ώμου; Άλλο
en: Travel spinning wheel portability features: Breaks down for packing; Built-in carrying handle; Collapsible components; Folding frame; Includes carrying bag; Includes hard travel case; Lightweight design; Locking folded position; Quick assembly/disassembly; Rolling case compatible; Shoulder strap attachment points; Other
ru: Особенности портативности дорожной прялки: Разбирается для упаковки; Встроенная ручка для переноски; Складные детали; Складная рама; Сумка для переноски в комплекте; Жесткий дорожный чехол в комплекте; Легкая конструкция; Фиксация в сложенном положении; Быстрая сборка/разборка; Совместимость с сумкой на колесиках; Крепления для плечевого ремня; Другое
bg-BG: Характеристики за преносимост на преносим чекрък.: Разглобява се за опаковане; Вградена дръжка за носене; Сгъваеми компоненти; Сгъваема рамка; Включва чанта за носене; Включва твърд калъф за пътуване; Олекотен дизайн; Заключване в сгънато положение; Бързо сглобяване/разглобяване; Съвместимост с куфар на колелца; Точки за закрепване на презрамка; Друго
sv: Bärbarhetsfunktioner för rese-spinnrock: Kan plockas isär för packning; Inbyggt bärhandtag; Hopfällbara komponenter; Hopfällbar ram; Bärväska ingår; Hårt resefodral ingår; Lättviktsdesign; Låsbar i hopfällt läge; Snabb montering/demontering; Kompatibel med rullväska; Fästpunkter för axelrem; Övrigt
es: Características de portabilidad de la rueca de viaje: Se desmonta para empacar; Asa de transporte integrada; Componentes plegables; Marco plegable; Incluye bolso de transporte; Incluye estuche rígido de viaje; Diseño liviano; Posición de plegado con bloqueo; Ensamblaje/desmontaje rápido; Compatible con estuche con ruedas; Puntos de fijación para correa de hombro; Otra
de: Transportmerkmale des Reise-Spinnrads: Zerlegbar zum Verpacken; Integrierter Tragegriff; Zusammenklappbare Komponenten; Klapprahmen; Inklusive Tragetasche; Inklusive Hartschalenkoffer; Leichtes Design; Arretierung in zusammengeklappter Position; Schnelle Montage/Demontage; Kompatibel mit Rollkoffer; Befestigungspunkte für Schultergurt; Sonstige
ko: 여행용 물레 휴대 기능: 포장용 분해 가능; 내장형 휴대용 손잡이; 접이식 부품; 접이식 프레임; 휴대용 가방 포함; 하드 여행용 케이스 포함; 경량 디자인; 접힌 상태로 잠금; 빠른 조립/분해; 롤링 케이스 호환 가능; 어깨 스트랩 부착 포인트; 기타
ja: 旅行用紡績機携帯機能: パッキング用に分解可能; 内蔵キャリングハンドル; 折りたたみ可能な部品; 折りたたみ式フレーム; キャリングバッグ付き; ハードトラベルケース付き; 軽量設計; 折りたたみ位置のロック; 素早い組み立て / 分解; ローリングケース対応; ショルダーストラップ取り付けポイント; その他
hr-HR: Značajke prenosivosti putnog kolovrata: Rastavlja se za pakiranje; Ugrađena ručka za nošenje; Sklopive komponente; Sklopivi okvir; Uključuje torbu za nošenje; Uključuje tvrdi putni kovčeg; Lagan dizajn; Zaključavanje sklopljenog položaja; Brzo sastavljanje/rastavljanje; Kompatibilno s kovčegom na kotačiće; Točke za pričvršćivanje naramenice; Ostalo
vi: Tính năng di động của máy kéo sợi du lịch: Tháo rời để đóng gói; Tay cầm tích hợp; Các bộ phận có thể thu gọn; Khung gập; Kèm túi đựng; Kèm hộp đựng du lịch cứng; Thiết kế mỏng nhẹ; Khóa vị trí gập; Lắp ráp/tháo dỡ nhanh; Tương thích với vali kéo; Điểm gắn dây đeo vai; Khác
sl-SI: Lastnosti prenosljivosti potovalnega kolovrata: Razstavljivo za pakiranje; Vgrajen ročaj za prenašanje; Zložljive komponente; Zložljiv okvir; Vključuje torbo za prenašanje; Vključuje trdi potovalni kovček; Lahka zasnova; Zaklep v zloženi legi; Hitra sestava/razstavljanje; Združljivo s kovčkom na kolesih; Točke za pritrditev ramenskega pasu; Drugo
pl: Cechy przenośności turystycznego kołowrotka przędzalniczego: Składane do spakowania; Wbudowany uchwyt do przenoszenia; Składane elementy; Składana rama; W zestawie z torbą do przenoszenia; W zestawie z twardym futerałem podróżnym; Lekka konstrukcja; Blokada w pozycji złożonej; Szybki montaż i demontaż; Kompatybilne z walizką na kółkach; Punkty mocowania paska na ramię; Inne
lt-LT: Kelioninio sukamojo rato perkėlimo ypatybės: Išardoma pakavimui; Integruota nešimo rankena; Sulankstomi komponentai; Sulankstomas rėmas; Yra nešimo krepšys; Yra kietas kelioninis dėklas; Lengvas dizainas; Fiksuojama sulankstyta padėtis; Greitas surinkimas / išardymas; Suderinama su lagaminu ant ratukų; Tvirtinimo taškai petnešai; Kita
hu: Utazó forgókerék hordozhatósági jellemzői: Csomagoláshoz szétszedhető; Beépített hordozófogantyú; Összecsukható alkatrészek; Összecsukható váz; Hordozótáskával; Kemény utazótokkal; Könnyű kialakítás; Zárható összecsukott pozíció; Gyors összeszerelés/szétszerelés; Gurulós bőrönddel kompatibilis; Vállpánt rögzítési pontok; Egyéb
fr: Caractéristiques de transport du rouet de voyage: Se démonte pour l'emballage; Poignée de transport intégrée; Composants pliables; Cadre pliant; Sac de transport inclus; Étui de voyage rigide inclus; Conception légère; Verrouillage en position pliée; Montage/démontage rapide; Compatible avec les valises à roulettes; Points d'attache pour bandoulière; Autre
ro-RO: Caracteristici de portabilitate ale roții de tors de călătorie: Se demontează pentru ambalare; Mâner de transport încorporat; Componente pliabile; Cadru pliabil; Include geantă de transport; Include carcasă rigidă de transport; Design ușor; Blocare în poziție pliată; Asamblare/dezasamblare rapidă; Compatibil cu geantă pe role; Puncte de atașare pentru curea de umăr; Altele
pt-BR: Roda de fiar portátil recursos de portabilidade: Desmonta para embalar; Alça de transporte embutida; Componentes dobráveis; Estrutura dobrável; Inclui bolsa de transporte; Inclui estojo de viagem rígido; Design leve; Travamento na posição dobrada; Montagem/desmontagem rápida; Compatível com mala de rodinhas; Pontos de fixação para alça de ombro; Outro
nb: Portabilitetsegenskaper for reisespinnehjul: Kan demonteres for pakking; Innebygd bærehåndtak; Sammenleggbare komponenter; Sammenleggbar ramme; Inkluderer bæreveske; Inkluderer hard reisekoffert; Lett design; Låses i sammenlagt posisjon; Rask montering/demontering; Kompatibel med trillekoffert; Festepunkter for skulderstropp; Annet
nl: Reisspinnewiel draagbaarheidskenmerken: Demonteerbaar; Ingebouwde draaggreep; Inklapbare componenten; Opvouwbaar frame; Inclusief draagtas; Inclusief harde reiskoffer; Lichtgewicht ontwerp; Vergrendeling in opgevouwen positie; Snelle montage/demontage; Compatibel met rolkoffer; Bevestigingspunten voor schouderband; Overig
cs: Vlastnosti přenosnosti cestovního kolovrátku: Rozložitelný pro balení; Vestavěné držadlo pro přenášení; Skládací součásti; Skládací rám; Včetně tašky na přenášení; Včetně pevného cestovního pouzdra; Lehká konstrukce; Uzamčení ve složené poloze; Rychlé složení/rozložení; Kompatibilní s kufrem na kolečkách; Upevňovací body pro ramenní popruh; Jiné
zh-TW: 旅行紡車便攜性功能: 可拆卸收納; 內建提把; 可摺疊組件; 摺疊框架; 內含提袋; 內含硬殼旅行箱; 輕量設計; 鎖定摺疊位置; 快速組裝/拆卸; 相容於拉桿箱; 肩帶連接點; 其他
sk-SK: Funkcie prenosnosti cestovného kolovratu: Dá sa rozložiť na zbalenie; Zabudovaná rukoväť na prenášanie; Skladacie komponenty; Skladací rám; Obsahuje tašku na prenášanie; Obsahuje tvrdé cestovné puzdro; Ľahký dizajn; Uzamknutie zloženej polohy; Rýchla montáž/demontáž; Kompatibilné s puzdrom na kolieskach; Body na pripevnenie popruhu na rameno; Iné
it: Caratteristiche di portabilità della ruota di filatura da viaggio: Smontabile per l’imballaggio; Maniglia di trasporto integrata; Componenti pieghevoli; Telaio pieghevole; Include borsa per il trasporto; Include custodia rigida da viaggio; Design leggero; Blocco in posizione piegata; Montaggio/smontaggio rapido; Compatibile con trolley; Punti di attacco per tracolla; Altro
th: คุณสมบัติการพกพาของเครื่องปั่นด้ายสำหรับเดินทาง: ถอดประกอบเพื่อแพ็คได้; หูหิ้วในตัว; ชิ้นส่วนพับเก็บได้; โครงพับได้; มาพร้อมกระเป๋าพกพา; มาพร้อมเคสเดินทางแบบแข็ง; ดีไซน์น้ำหนักเบา; ล็อกตำแหน่งเมื่อพับ; ประกอบ/ถอดประกอบอย่างรวดเร็ว; ใช้กับกระเป๋าล้อลากได้; จุดติดสายสะพายไหล่; อื่นๆ
fi: Matkarukin siirrettävyysominaisuudet: Purettavissa pakkausta varten; Sisäänrakennettu kantokahva; Kokoontaitettavat osat; Taitettava runko; Sisältää kantokassin; Sisältää kovan matkakotelon; Kevyt muotoilu; Lukittava taitettu asento; Nopea kokoaminen/purkaminen; Yhteensopiva pyörällisen laukun kanssa; Olkahihnan kiinnityspisteet; Muu
zh-CN: 旅行纺车便携性特点: 可拆卸以方便打包; 内置提手; 可折叠组件; 折叠框架; 包含便携包; 包含硬质旅行盒; 轻量化设计; 锁定折叠位置; 快速组装/拆卸; 兼容拉杆箱; 肩带连接点; 其他
da: Bærbarhedsfunktioner for rejsespinderok: Kan skilles ad for pakning; Indbygget bærehåndtag; Sammenklappelige komponenter; Foldestel; Inkluderer bæretaske; Inkluderer hård rejsekuffert; Letvægtsdesign; Låser i sammenklappet position; Hurtig samling/adskillelse; Kompatibel med rullekuffert; Fastgørelsespunkter til skulderrem; Andet
tr: Seyahat tipi iplik eğirme makinesi taşınabilirlik özellikleri: Paketleme için sökülebilir; Dahili taşıma sapı; Katlanabilir parçalar; Katlanabilir iskelet; Taşıma çantası dahildir; Sert seyahat çantası dahildir; Hafif tasarım; Katlanmış pozisyonda kilitleme; Hızlı kurulum/söküm; Tekerlekli çanta ile uyumlu; Omuz askısı bağlantı noktaları; Diğer